Mississippi, session 2026, HB757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Any person who has been convicted as a first-time offender of a criminal offense which is eligible for expunction as provided in Section 99-19-71 shall be automatically granted an order from the court, in which he or she was convicted, an order to expunge any such conviction from all public records after the successful completion of all the terms and conditions of the sentence for such conviction.  Upon entering such an order, a nonpublic record thereof shall be retained solely for the purpose of use in determining whether in subsequent proceedings, such person is a first offender.  The fees and costs associated with an automatic expunction granted to a first time offender under this section shall be waived by the court and performed as a pro bono service by the representing legal counsel. The effect of such an order shall be to restore such person, in the contemplation of the law to the status he occupied before such arrest. SECTION 2.  Section 41-29-150, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-150.  (a)  Any person convicted under Section 41-29-139 may be required, in the discretion of the court, as a part of the sentence otherwise imposed, or in lieu of imprisonment in cases of probation or suspension of sentence, to attend a course of instruction conducted by the bureau, the State Board of Health, or any similar agency, on the effects, medically, psychologically and socially, of the misuse of controlled substances.  The course may be conducted at any correctional institution, detention center or hospital, or at any center or treatment facility established for the purpose of education and rehabilitation of those persons committed because of abuse of controlled substances. (b)  Any person convicted under Section 41-29-139 who is found to be dependent upon or addicted to any controlled substance shall be required, as a part of the sentence otherwise imposed, or in lieu of imprisonment in cases of parole, probation or suspension of sentence, to receive medical treatment for such dependency or addiction. The regimen of medical treatment may include confinement in a medical facility of any correctional institution, detention center or hospital, or at any center or facility established for treatment of those persons committed because of a dependence or addiction to controlled substances. (c)  Those persons previously convicted of a felony under Section 41-29-139 and who are now confined at the Mississippi State Hospital at Whitfield, Mississippi, or at the East Mississippi State Hospital at Meridian, Mississippi, for the term of their sentence shall remain under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Department of Corrections and shall be required to abide by all reasonable rules and regulations promulgated by the director and staff of said institutions and of the Department of Corrections.  Any persons so confined who shall refuse to abide by said rules or who attempt an escape or who shall escape shall be transferred to the * * *State Penitentiary Mississippi Department of Corrections or to a county jail, where appropriate, to serve the remainder of the term of imprisonment; this provision shall not preclude prosecution and conviction for escape from said institutions. (d)  (1)  If any person who has not previously been convicted of violating Section 41-29-139, or the laws of the United States or of another state relating to narcotic drugs, stimulant or depressant substances, other controlled substances or marihuana is found to be guilty of a violation of subsection (c) or (d) of Section 41-29-139, after trial or upon a plea of guilty, the court may, without entering a judgment of guilty and with the consent of such person, defer further proceedings and place him on probation upon such reasonable conditions as it may require and for such period, not to exceed three (3) years, as the court may prescribe. Upon violation of a condition of the probation, the court may enter an adjudication of guilt and proceed as otherwise provided. The court may, in its discretion, dismiss the proceedings against such person and discharge him from probation before the expiration of the maximum period prescribed for such person's probation.  If during the period of his probation such person does not violate any of the conditions of the probation, then upon expiration of such period the court shall discharge such person and dismiss the proceedings against him. Discharge and dismissal under this subsection shall be without court adjudication of guilt, but a nonpublic record thereof shall be retained by the bureau solely for the purpose of use by the courts in determining whether or not, in subsequent proceedings, such person qualifies under this subsection. Such discharge or dismissal shall not be deemed a conviction for purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime, including the penalties prescribed under this article for second or subsequent conviction, or for any other purpose.  Discharge and dismissal under this subsection may occur only once with respect to any person; and (2)  Upon the dismissal of a person and discharge of proceedings against him under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the person may apply to the court for an order to expunge from all official records, other than the nonpublic records to be retained by the bureau under paragraph (1) of this subsection, all recordation relating to his arrest, indictment, trial, finding of guilt, and dismissal and discharge pursuant to this section.  If the court determines, after hearing, that such person was dismissed and the proceedings against him discharged, or that the person had satisfactorily served his sentence or period of probation and parole, it shall enter an order of expunction.  The effect of the order shall be to restore the person, in the contemplation of the law, to the status he occupied before such arrest or indictment.  No person as to whom such an order has been entered shall be held thereafter under any provision of any law to be guilty of perjury or otherwise giving a false statement by reason of his failures to recite or acknowledge such arrest, indictment or trial in response to any inquiry made of him for any purpose.  A person as to whom an order has been entered, upon request, shall be required to advise the court, in camera, of the previous conviction and expunction in any legal proceeding wherein the person has been called as a prospective juror.  The court shall thereafter and before the selection of the jury advise the attorneys representing the parties of the previous conviction and expunction. (e)  Every person who has been or may hereafter be convicted of a felony offense under Section 41-29-139 and sentenced under Section 41-29-150(c) shall be under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. (f)  It shall be unlawful for any person confined under the provisions of subsection (b) or (c) of this section to escape or attempt to escape from said institution, and, upon conviction, said person shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned for a term not to exceed two (2) years. (g)  It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature to promote the rehabilitation of persons convicted of offenses under the Uniform Controlled Substances Law. (h)  Convictions of first-time offenders shall be expunged automatically as provided in Section 1 of this act. SECTION 3.  Section 99-15-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-15-57.  (1)  Any person who pled guilty within six (6) months prior to March 31, 1983, and who would have otherwise been eligible for the relief allowed in Section 99-15-26, may apply to the court in which such person was sentenced for an order to expunge from all official public records all recordation relating to his arrest, indictment, trial, finding of guilty and sentence.  If the court determines, after hearing, that such person has satisfactorily served his sentence or period of probation and parole, pled guilty within six (6) months prior to March 31, 1983, and would have otherwise been eligible for the relief allowed in Section 99-15-26, it may enter such order.  The effect of such order shall be to restore such person, in the contemplation of the law, to the status he occupied before such arrest or indictment.  No person as to whom such order has been entered shall be held thereafter under any provision of any law to be guilty of perjury or otherwise giving a false statement by reason of his failures to recite or acknowledge such arrest, or indictment or trial in response to any inquiry made of him for any purpose. (2)  Upon petition therefor, the court shall expunge the record of any case in which an arrest was made, the person arrested was released and the case was dismissed or the charges were dropped, there was no disposition of such case, or the person was found not guilty at trial. (3)  A conviction of a first-time offender shall be expunged automatically as provided in Section 1 of this act. SECTION 4.  Section 99-19-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-19-71.  (1)  Any person who has been convicted of a misdemeanor that is not a traffic violation, and who is a first offender, may petition the justice, county, circuit or municipal court in which the conviction was had for an order to expunge any such conviction from all public records. (2)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person who has been convicted of a felony and who has paid all criminal fines and costs of court imposed in the sentence of conviction may petition the court in which the conviction was had for an order to expunge one (1) conviction from all public records * * *five (5) two (2) years after the successful completion of all terms and conditions of the sentence for the conviction upon a hearing as determined in the discretion of the court; however, a person is not eligible to expunge a felony classified as: (i)  A crime of violence as provided in Section 97-3-2; (ii)  Arson, first degree as provided in Sections 97-17-1 and 97-17-3; (iii)  Trafficking in controlled substances as provided in Section 41-29-139; (iv)  A third, fourth or subsequent offense DUI as provided in Section 63-11-30(2)(c) and (2)(d); (v)  Felon in possession of a firearm as provided in Section 97-37-5; (vi)  Failure to register as a sex offender as provided in Section 45-33-33; (vii)  Voyeurism as provided in Section 97-29-61; (viii)  Witness intimidation as provided in Section 97-9-113; (ix)  Abuse, neglect or exploitation of a vulnerable person as provided in Section 43-47-19; or (x)  Embezzlement as provided in Sections 97-11-25 and 97-23-19. A person is eligible for only one (1) felony expunction under this paragraph.  For the purposes of this section, the terms "one (1) conviction" and "one (1) felony expunction" mean and include all convictions that arose from a common nucleus of operative facts as determined in the discretion of the court. (b)  The petitioner shall give ten (10) days' written notice to the district attorney before any hearing on the petition.  In all cases, the court wherein the petition is filed may grant the petition if the court determines, on the record or in writing, that the applicant is rehabilitated from the offense which is the subject of the petition.  In those cases where the court denies the petition, the findings of the court in this respect shall be identified specifically and not generally. (3)  Upon entering an order of expunction under this section, a nonpublic record thereof shall be retained by the Mississippi Criminal Information Center solely for the purpose of determining whether, in subsequent proceedings, the person is a first offender.  The order of expunction shall not preclude a district attorney's office from retaining a nonpublic record thereof for law enforcement purposes only.  The existence of an order of expunction shall not preclude an employer from asking a prospective employee if the employee has had an order of expunction entered on his behalf.  The effect of the expunction order shall be to restore the person, in the contemplation of the law, to the status he occupied before any arrest or indictment for which convicted.  No person as to whom an expunction order has been entered shall be held thereafter under any provision of law to be guilty of perjury or to have otherwise given a false statement by reason of his failure to recite or acknowledge such arrest, indictment or conviction in response to any inquiry made of him for any purpose other than the purpose of determining, in any subsequent proceedings under this section, whether the person is a first offender.  A person as to whom an order has been entered, upon request, shall be required to advise the court, in camera, of the previous conviction and expunction in any legal proceeding wherein the person has been called as a prospective juror.  The court shall thereafter and before the selection of the jury advise the attorneys representing the parties of the previous conviction and expunction. (4)  Upon petition therefor, a justice, county, circuit or municipal court shall expunge the record of any case in which an arrest was made, the person arrested was released and the case was dismissed or the charges were dropped or there was no disposition of such case, or the person was found not guilty at trial.  Convictions of first-time offenders shall be expunged automatically as provided in Section 1 of this act. (5)  No public official is eligible for expunction under this section for any conviction related to his official duties. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.